Massachusetts, session 194th, H2997.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Editions,
is hereby further amended by inserting in the description of Group 4 in paragraph (g) of
subdivision (2), in line 268, after the words fire control men; the following:--- employees of the
Massachusetts port authority who are employed as port officers and supervisors of said
employees who shall include port sergeants, lieutenants, captains, assistant chiefs, deputy chiefs,
directors;
of 1